Tennessee, session 114, SB2371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-501(10), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(10) "Teacher":
(A) Includes teachers, supervisors, principals, director of schools, and all
other certificated personnel employed by any local board of education, for service
in public elementary and secondary schools in this state, supported in whole or in
part by state or federal funds; and
(B) Does not include an individual who holds a temporary academic
permit or temporary clinical permit pursuant to § 49-5-106;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-301(b)(1)(EE), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(viii) This subdivision (b)(1)(EE) does not apply to individuals who hold a
temporary academic permit or temporary clinical permit pursuant to § 49-5-106;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2371
012110
- 1 -